South Dakota, session 2026, SB91.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 11-2-28.2 be AMENDED:
11-2-28.2. A petition pursuant to § 11-2-28 or 11-2-28.1 must be filed with the
office of the county auditor. The county auditor shall forward the petition to the
commission, or a person designated by the commission, for consideration at its next
regular or special meeting and provide a copy to the board, or a person designated by the
board. Within forty-five days of the presentation, the commission shall hold a public
hearing on the petition, subject to the requirements of § 11-2-29, and make a
recommendation on the petitioned request to the board.
Upon receipt of the commission's recommendation, the board must hold a public
hearing, subject to the requirements of § 11-2-19, and take action upon the petitioned
request, pursuant to § 11-2-30.

26.443.11 2 91
An Act to clarify the procedure for petitioning a board of county commissioners for a change
to the comprehensive plan or zoning ordinances.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 91
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 91 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB91 ENROLLED